apertium-nno.nno.dix
<pardef n="v:enkje_enke.kons-kj2k_gj2g">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:enkje_enke.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:følgje_følge.kons-lgj2lg">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:følgje_følge.kons-lgj2lg"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:følgje_fylgje.vok-ø_gj2y_gj">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:følgje_fylgje.vok-ø_gj2y_gj"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:kjende_kjente.vb-d2t">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:kjende_kjente.vb-d2t"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:bygd_bygt.vb-d2t">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:bygd_bygt.vb-d2t"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:de_dokker.prn">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                     <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:de_dokker.prn"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:medan_mens.syn">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                      <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:medan_mens.syn"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:infa_infe">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:infa_infe"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:me_vi">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:me_vi"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:er_ar.vb-e2a">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:er_ar.vb-e2a"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:brukte_bruka.vb-e2a">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:brukte_bruka.vb-e2a"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:håpa_håpte.vb-e2a">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:håpa_håpte.vb-e2a"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:tek_tar.vb-en2tt">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                   <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:tek_tar.vb-en2tt"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:dreg_drar.vb-en2tt">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                   <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:dreg_drar.vb-en2tt"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:dratt_dradd.vb-en2tt">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                   <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:dratt_dradd.vb-en2tt"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:gir_gjev.vb-en2tt">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                   <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:gir_gjev.vb-en2tt"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:givar_gjevar.stav">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                   <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:givar_gjevar.stav"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:eigde_åtte.vb">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                   <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:eigde_åtte.vb"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:venne_venje.vb">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                   <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:venne_venje.vb"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:vart-vorte_blei-blitt.vb-bli2verte">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                     <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:vart-vorte_blei-blitt.vb-bli2verte"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:vart-vorte_vart-blitt.vb-bli2verte">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                     <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:vart-vorte_vart-blitt.vb-bli2verte"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:bli_verte.vb-bli2verte">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                     <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:bli_verte.vb-bli2verte"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:stader_stadar.n-pl-e2a">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                     <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:stader_stadar.n-pl-e2a"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:elvar_elver.n-pl-e2a">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                     <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:elvar_elver.n-pl-e2a"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:vit_vett">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                    <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:vit_vett"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:brot_brott.kons-t2tt">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                    <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:brot_brott.kons-t2tt"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:mengd_mengde.vok-2e">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                    <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:mengd_mengde.vok-2e"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:blå_blåe.adj">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:blå_blåe.adj"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:lét_let">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:lét_let"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:blæs_blåser.vb">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:blæs_blåser.vb"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:skule_skole.vok-u2o">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:skule_skole.vok-u2o"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:skolere_skulere.vok-u2o">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:skolere_skulere.vok-u2o"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:jul_jol.vok-u2o">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:jul_jol.vok-u2o"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:sommar_sumar.vok-o2u">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:sommar_sumar.vok-o2u"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:stove_stue.vok-u2o">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:stove_stue.vok-u2o"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:høvding_hovding.vok-ø2o">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:høvding_hovding.vok-ø2o"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:kors_kross.stav">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:kors_kross.stav"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:venn_ven.kons-mm2m">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:venn_ven.kons-mm2m"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:komme_kome.kons-mm2m">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:komme_kome.kons-mm2m"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:dommen_domen.kons-mm2m">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:dommen_domen.kons-mm2m"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:kjøtt_kjøt.kons-mm2m">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:kjøtt_kjøt.kons-mm2m"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:mogleg_mogeleg.vok-2e">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:mogleg_mogeleg.vok-2e"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:nærare_nærmare.stav">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:nærare_nærmare.stav"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:eigentleg_eigenleg.stav">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:eigentleg_eigenleg.stav"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v:styresmakt_styremakt.stav">
  <e r="LR">   <p><l></l>                 <r></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">   <p><l><s n="v:styresmakt_styremakt.stav"/></l> <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="nokre gongar" c="v:">   <p><l>nokre<b/>gongar</l><r>nokre<b/>gonger</r></p><par n="v:stader_stadar.n-pl-e2a"/><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="fleire gongar" c="v:"> <p><l>fleire<b/>gongar</l><r>fleire<b/>gonger</r></p><par n="v:stader_stadar.n-pl-e2a"/><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
